Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 5. Urban Flood Control.
§ 51-35-331.
Details of bonds.

All such bonds provided by this article shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code, shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting, shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), shall be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto. Such bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. They shall mature annually in such amounts and at such times as shall be provided by the resolution of the board of directors. However, no bond shall have a longer maturity than forty (40) years from the date of issuance thereof. The denomination, form, and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution of the board of directors of the district. Such bonds shall be signed by the president and the secretary of such board, with the seal of the district affixed thereto, but the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president and secretary. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

If so specified in the resolution directing the issuance thereof, such bonds may be called in, paid, or redeemed in inverse numerical order prior to maturity, upon not less than thirty (30) days notice to the paying agent or agents designated in such bonds, and at such premium as may be designated in such bonds. However, in no case shall any premiums exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

All such bonds shall contain in substance a statement to the effect that they are secured solely by a pledge of the ad valorem tax levy provided in this article, they do not constitute general obligations of the state of Mississippi or of the counties or municipalities comprising said district, and they are not secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit and resources of said state or of such counties or municipalities.

All such bonds as provided for herein shall be sold at public sale as now provided by law. Except as otherwise provided hereinabove, no such sale shall be at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond value, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity.

This article shall be full and complete authority for the issuance of the bonds provided for herein, and no restriction or limitation otherwise prescribed by law shall apply herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-17; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 17; Laws, 1981, ch. 444, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 24, ch. 541, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 51-35-333.
Bonds payable from ad valorem taxation.

To provide funds for the payment of the principal of, interest on, and other charges in connection with bonds issued under the provisions of this article, to provide funds for the annual expenses of operations of the district, and to provide funds for carrying out any of the purposes of this article, the district is empowered to levy annually a special tax upon all the taxable property within such district on or before the first Monday of September of each year and shall certify the levy to the boards of supervisors of the various counties in the district. It shall be the duty of the boards of supervisors of each county to make the levy on each tract of land or other property in the district according to the assessed valuation thereof.

The taxes shall be collected by the tax collectors of the respective counties in the district, who shall deposit them in such depository as shall be selected by the board of directors of the district. The tax collector shall receive a sum not greater than one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) of the amount collected for his services in making such collection, and the fee shall be paid into the county general fund. It shall be the duty of the board of directors to levy a tax sufficient to pay the bonds and the interest thereon as such bonds and interest become due, to pay for the annual expense of operation of the district, and to provide funds for carrying out any of the purposes of this article.

If the board of directors undertakes a flood and drainage control improvement project that the board determines will benefit only a portion of the district:

The board of directors may levy a special improvement assessment that applies only to property in the district that is directly or indirectly benefited by the project to provide funds for the payment of costs related to the flood and drainage control improvement project, including the payment of costs related to the principal and interest on any bonds issued under this article for the project and any related expenses; and

The board of directors may levy a special improvement maintenance assessment that applies only to property in the district that is directly or indirectly benefited by the project to provide funds for the operation, maintenance and preservation of the project.

Prior to levying an assessment under this subsection, the board of directors shall make a determination that the necessary approvals and authorizations are in place and that project-related activities are ready to commence.

If an assessment is levied under this subsection, the board of directors shall annually determine, order and levy the annual installment of the total assessments. These assessments may be due and collected during each year that county taxes are due and collected, in which case the annual installment and levy shall be evidenced to and certified to the county tax assessor by the board of directors not later than the first Monday of September of each year. The assessments shall be entered by the assessor on the county tax rolls and shall be collected and enforced by the county tax collector in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to the district. These assessments shall be a lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall be collectible and enforceable in like manner as county property taxes. All statutes regulating the collection and enforcement of county property taxes shall apply to the enforcement and collection of the assessments levied under this subsection. The amount of the assessments under this subsection shall be determined by the board of directors and assessed by the board of directors upon such lands, which may be part or all of the lands within the district benefited by the project, apportioned between benefited lands in proportion to the benefits received by each tract of land.

The tax collector shall be entitled to reasonable compensation for collecting the assessments which shall be not greater than one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) of the amount collected for his services in making such collection, and the fee shall be paid into the county general fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-18; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 18; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 51-35-335.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be validated as now provided by law by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11 Mississippi Code of 1972. The services of the state’s bond attorney may be employed in the preparation of such bond resolutions, forms, or proceedings as may be necessary, for which he shall be paid a reasonable fee. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the chancery court of the county having jurisdiction of the district, but notice of such validation proceedings shall be published at least two times in a newspaper of general circulation and published in each of the counties comprising the district, the first publication of which in each case shall be made at least ten days preceding the date set for the validation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-19; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-337.
Bonds as legal investments.

All bonds of the district shall be and are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for public funds of counties, cities, towns, school districts, banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and for funds of the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for said deposits to the extent of their value, when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-20; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-339.
District and its bonds exempt from taxation.

The accomplishment of the purposes stated in this article being for the benefit of the people of this state and for the improvement of their properties and industries, the district, in carrying out the purposes of this article, will be performing an essential public function and shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on the project and related facilities or any part thereof. The interest on the bonds issued hereunder shall at all times be free from any taxation within this state, and the state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds to be issued hereunder that the district shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its political subdivisions or taxing districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-340.
Authorization for short-term borrowing by certain levee districts.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to borrow money from time to time, in an amount not to exceed Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($900,000.00) in the aggregate outstanding at any one (1) time, in order to defray expenses of the district for the purpose of acquiring, repairing, maintaining, strengthening and rebuilding dams, reservoirs, channels, levees, pumps and other flood control works and improvements for the district.

Before any money is borrowed under the provisions of this section, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution declaring the necessity for such borrowing and specifying the purpose for which the money borrowed is to be expended, the amount to be borrowed, the date or dates of the maturity thereof, and how such indebtedness is to be evidenced. The resolution shall be certified over the signature of the president of the board of directors.

The borrowing shall be evidenced by negotiable notes or certificates of indebtedness of the district which shall be signed by the president and secretary of the district. All such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be offered at public sale by the district after not less than ten (10) days’ advertising in a newspaper having general circulation within the district. Each sale shall be made to the bidder offering the lowest rate of interest or whose bid represents the lowest net cost to the district; however, the rate of interest shall not exceed ten percent (10%). No such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be issued and sold for less than par and accrued interest. All notes or certificates of indebtedness shall mature in approximately equal installments of principal and interest over a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years from the dates of the issuance thereof. Principal shall be payable annually, and interest shall be payable annually or semiannually; provided, however, that the first payment of principal or interest may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. Provided, however, if negotiable notes are outstanding from not more than one (1) previous issue authorized under the provisions of this section, then the schedule of payments for a new or supplementary issue may be so adjusted that the schedule of maturities of all notes or series of notes hereunder shall, when combined, mature in approximately equal installments of principal and interest over a period of fifteen (15) years from the date of the new or supplementary issue; or, if a lower interest rate will thereby be secured on notes previously issued and outstanding, a portion of the proceeds of any issue authorized hereunder may be used to refund the balance of the indebtedness previously issued under the authority of this section. Such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be issued in such form and in such denominations as may be determined by the board of directors and may be made payable at the office of any bank or trust company selected by the board of directors. In such case, funds for the payment of principal and interest due thereon shall be provided in the same manner provided by law for the payment of the principal and interest due on bonds issued by the board of directors.

For the prompt payment of notes or certificates of indebtedness at maturity, both principal and interest, there is hereby pledged the avails of the ad valorem tax authorized in Section 51-35-333, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any other available funds of the district designated by the board of directors. Pledged funds shall be paid into a sinking fund and used exclusively for the payment of principal of and interest on the notes or certificates of indebtedness. Until needed for expenditure, monies in the sinking fund may be invested in the same manner as municipalities are authorized by law to invest surplus funds.

The proceeds of any notes or certificates of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this section shall be placed in a special fund and shall be expended only for the purpose or purposes for which they were issued as shown by the resolution authorizing the issuance thereof. If a balance shall remain of the proceeds of such notes or certificates of indebtedness after the purpose or purposes for which they were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall be used to pay such obligations at or before maturity and may be transferred to any sinking fund previously established for the payment thereof.

Proceeds from the sale of notes or certificates of indebtedness not immediately necessary for expenditure shall be invested in the same manner as surplus funds of municipalities may be invested.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 617, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1991).

§ 51-35-341.
Preliminary expenses.

The district may borrow funds for a period of not to exceed three years and may renew and extend said loans from time to time, from any city, municipality, county, state, the United States of America, or any of its agencies or departments, or from any other source to pay the preliminary expenses of organizing the district or for carrying out any of the purposes of this article, including engineering services, attorneys fees and expenses, and other organization and administration expenses, on such terms of repayment as the board of directors shall determine; and any municipality or county in which any part of the district shall lie may advance or loan funds to said district for such purposes. Any such municipality or county making such loan or advance is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed three years from the date of such borrowing for the purpose of making such loan or advance. The board of directors is hereby authorized to repay any such advances from the proceeds of any bonds issued under the provisions of this article. In the event any said loan or advance is not paid at maturity thereof, the district is authorized to levy a tax on the lands of the district under the provisions of this article for the repayment thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-343.
Depository for funds of district.

The board of directors shall designate one or more banks within any county in which any part of the district shall lie to serve as depositories for the funds of the district, and all funds of the district shall be deposited in such depository bank or banks.

Before designating a depository bank or banks, the board of directors shall issue a notice stating the time and place the board will meet for such purpose and inviting the banks in the counties in which any part of the district shall lie to submit applications to be designated depositories. The term of service for depositories shall be prescribed by the board. Such notice shall be published one time in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the district and specified by the board.

At the time mentioned in the notice, the board shall consider the applications and the management and condition of the banks filing them, and shall designate as depositories the bank or banks which offer the most favorable terms and conditions for the handling of the funds of the district and which the board finds have proper management and are in condition to warrant handling of district funds. Membership on the board of directors of an officer or director of a bank shall not disqualify such bank from being designated as a depository.

If no applications acceptable to the board are received by the time stated in the notice, the board shall designate some bank or banks within or without the district upon such terms and conditions as it may find advantageous to the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-345.
Agreements with the United States, the state, or political subdivisions.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized and empowered to negotiate and contract with the United States of America, the State of Mississippi, or any political subdivision thereof concerning the location, relocation, alteration, construction, changing, or closing of any highway, street, bridge, or roadway, or for the facilities appurtenant thereto, and all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-24; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-347.
Cooperation with other governmental agencies.

The district shall have authority to act jointly with political subdivisions of the state, its agencies, and commissions and instrumentalities thereof, with other states, with municipalities, with the United States of America, and agencies, departments, and instrumentalities thereof, in the performance of the purposes and services authorized in this article, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the directors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-25; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-349.
Urban flood and drainage control law controlling.

The provisions of any other law, general, special, or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-26; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).

§ 51-35-351.
Savings clause.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to violate any provision of the federal or state constitutions, and all acts done under this article shall be done in such manner as will conform thereto, whether herein expressly provided or not. Where any procedure hereunder may be held by any court to be violative of either of such constitutions, the district shall have the power by resolution to provide an alternative procedure conformable with such constitutions. If any provision of this article shall be invalid, such fact shall not affect the creation of the district or the validity of any other provision of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3665-27; Laws, 1962, ch. 226, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1962).